California statutes. Corporations Code
(g) (1) The bylaws may contain any provision, not in conflict with the articles, to manage and conduct the business affairs of the corporation effective only in an emergency as defined in Section 9140, including, but
 not limited to, procedures for calling a board meeting, quorum requirements for a board meeting, and designation of additional or substitute directors.

(2) During an emergency, the board may take any action that it determines to be necessary or appropriate to respond to the emergency, mitigate the effects of the emergency, or comply with lawful federal and state government orders, but shall not take any action that requires the vote of the members, unless the required vote of the members was obtained prior to the emergency.

(3) All provisions of the regular bylaws consistent with the emergency bylaws shall remain effective during the emergency, and the emergency bylaws shall not be effective after the emergency ends.

(4) Corporate action taken in good faith in accordance with the emergency bylaws binds the
 corporation, and shall not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 523, Sec. 16.   (AB 663)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9152.

Any corporation may provide in its bylaws for delegates having some or all of the authority of members. Where delegates are provided for, the bylaws shall set forth delegates’ terms of office, any reasonable method for delegates’ selection and removal, and any reasonable method for calling, noticing, and holding meetings of delegates, may set forth the manner in which delegates may act by written ballot similar to Section 9413 for written ballot of members, and may set forth the manner in which delegates may participate in meetings of delegates similar to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 9211. Each delegate shall have one vote on each matter presented for action. A delegate shall not vote by proxy. Delegates may be given a name other than “delegates.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 523, Sec. 17.   (AB 663)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9153.

A corporation may provide in its bylaws for voting by its members or delegates on the basis of chapter or other organizational unit, or by region or other geographic grouping.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Location and Inspection of Articles and Bylaws [9160. - 9160.]

9160.

Every corporation shall keep at its principal office in this state the original or a copy of its articles and bylaws as amended to date, which shall be open to inspection by the members at all reasonable times during office hours. If the corporation has no office in this state, it shall upon the written request of any member furnish to such member a copy of the articles or bylaws as amended to date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Directors and Management [9210. - 9260.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [9210. - 9215.]

9210.

Subject to the provisions of this part and any provision in the articles or bylaws:

(a) Each corporation shall have a board of directors. The activities and affairs of a corporation shall be conducted and all corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the direction of the board.

(b) The board may delegate the management of the activities of the corporation to any person or persons provided that the activities and affairs of the corporation shall be managed and all corporate powers shall be exercised under the ultimate direction of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 589, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9211.

(a) Unless otherwise provided in the articles or in the bylaws, all of the following apply:

(1) Meetings of the board may be called by the chair of the board or the president or any vice president or the secretary or any two directors.

(2) Regular meetings of the board may be held without notice if the time and place of the meetings are fixed by the bylaws or the board. Special meetings of the board shall be held upon four days’ notice by first-class mail or 48 hours’ notice delivered personally or by telephone, including a voice messaging system or by electronic transmission by a corporation (Section 20). The articles or bylaws may not dispense with notice of a special meeting. A notice, or waiver of
 notice, need not specify the purpose of any regular or special meeting of the board.

(3) Notice of a meeting need not be given to a director who provided a waiver of notice or consent to holding the meeting or an approval of the minutes thereof in writing, whether before or after the meeting, or who attends the meeting without protesting, prior thereto or at its commencement, the lack of notice to that director. These waivers, consents and approvals shall be filed with the corporate records or made a part of the minutes of the meetings.

(4) A majority of the directors present, whether or not a quorum is present, may adjourn any meeting to another time and place.

(5) Meetings of the board may be held at a place within or without the state that has been designated in the notice of the meeting or, if not stated in the
 notice or there is no notice, designated in the bylaws or by resolution of the board.

(6) Directors may participate in a meeting through use of conference telephone, electronic video screen communication, or electronic transmission by and to the corporation. Participation in a meeting through use of conference telephone or electronic video screen communication pursuant to this subdivision constitutes presence in person at that meeting as long as all directors participating in the meeting are able to hear one another. Participation in a meeting through use of electronic transmission by and to the corporation, other than conference telephone and electronic video screen communication pursuant to this subdivision constitutes presence in person at that meeting, if both of the following apply:

(A) Each director participating in the meeting can communicate with all of the other directors
 concurrently.

(B) Each director is provided the means of participating in all matters before the board, including, without limitation, the capacity to propose, or to interpose an objection to, a specific action to be taken by the corporation.

(7) A majority of the number of directors authorized in or pursuant to the articles or bylaws constitutes a quorum of the board for the transaction of business.

The articles or bylaws may require the presence of one or more specified directors in order to constitute a quorum of the board to transact business, as long as the death or nonexistence of a specified director or the death or nonexistence of the person or persons otherwise authorized to appoint or designate that director does not prevent the corporation from transacting business in the normal course of events.

(8) An act or decision done or made by a majority of the directors present at a meeting duly held at which a quorum is present is the act of the board. The articles or bylaws may not provide that a lesser vote than a majority of the directors present at a meeting is the act of the board. A meeting at which a quorum is initially present may continue to transact business notwithstanding the withdrawal of directors if any action taken is approved by at least a majority of the required quorum for that meeting, or a greater number required by this division, the articles or the bylaws.

(b) An action required or permitted to be taken by the board may be taken without a meeting if all directors shall individually or collectively consent in writing to that action and if, subject to subdivision (a) of Section 9224, the number of directors then in office constitutes a quorum. The written
 consent or consents shall be filed with the minutes of the proceedings of the board. The action by written consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote of the directors. For purposes of this subdivision only, “all directors” does not include an “interested director” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 9243 or a “common director” as described in subdivision (a) of Section 9244 who abstains in writing from providing consent, where (1) the facts described in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 9243 are established or the provisions of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9244 are satisfied, as appropriate, at or prior to execution of the written consent or consents; (2) the establishment of those facts or satisfaction of those provisions, as applicable, is included in the written consent or consents executed by the noninterested or noncommon directors or in other records of the corporation; and (3) the noninterested directors or noncommon directors, as applicable,
 approve the action by a vote that is sufficient without counting the votes of the interested directors or common directors.

(c) Each director shall have one vote on each matter presented to the board of directors for action. A director shall not vote by proxy.

(d) This section applies also to incorporators, to committees of the board, and to action by those incorporators or committees mutatis mutandis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 39.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

9212.

(a) Subject to any provision in the articles or bylaws: (i) the board may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the number of directors then in office, provided that a quorum is present, create one or more committees, each consisting of two or more directors, to serve at the pleasure of the board; and (ii) appointments to such committees shall be by a majority vote of the directors then in office. The bylaws may authorize one or more such committees, each consisting of two or more directors, and may provide that a specified officer or officers who are also directors of the corporation shall be a member or members of such committee or committees. The board may appoint one or more directors as alternate members of such committee, who may replace
 any absent member at any meeting of the committee. Such committee, to the extent provided in the resolution of the board or in the bylaws, shall have all the authority of the board, except with respect to:

(1) The approval of any action for which this part also requires approval of the members (Section 5034) or approval of a majority of all members (Section 5033) regardless of whether the corporation has members.

(2) The filling of vacancies on the board or in any committee which has the authority of the board.

(3) The fixing of compensation of the directors for serving on the board or on any committee.

(4) The amendment or repeal of bylaws or the adoption of new bylaws.

(5) The amendment
 or repeal of any resolution of the board which by its express terms is not so amendable or repealable.

(6) The appointment of committees of the board or the members thereof.

(b) A committee exercising the authority of the board shall not include as members persons who are not directors. However, the board may create other committees that do not exercise the authority of the board and these other committees may include persons regardless of whether they are directors.

(c) Unless the bylaws otherwise provide, the board may delegate to any committee powers as authorized by Section 9210, but may not delegate the powers set forth in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

 (d) The board shall take the actions regarding audit committees that are
 required by subdivision (e) of Section 12586 of the Government Code, if applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 442, Sec. 23.   (AB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9213.

(a) A corporation shall have (1) a chair of the board, who may be given the title chair, chairperson, chair of the board, or chairperson of the board, or a president or both, (2) a secretary, (3) a treasurer or a chief financial officer or both and (4) any other officers with any titles and duties as are stated in the bylaws or determined by the board and as may be necessary to enable it to sign instruments. The president, or if there is no president, the chair of the board, is the general manager and chief executive officer of the corporation, unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws. Unless otherwise specified in the articles or the bylaws, if there is no chief financial officer, the treasurer is the chief financial officer of the
 corporation. Any number of offices may be held by the same person unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, except that no person serving as the secretary, the treasurer, or the chief financial officer may serve concurrently as the president or chair of the board. Any compensation of the president or chief executive officer and the chief financial officer or treasurer shall be determined in accordance with subdivision (g) of Section 12586 of the Government Code, if applicable.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws, officers shall be chosen by the board and serve at the pleasure of the board, subject to the rights, if any, of an officer under any contract of employment. Any officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the corporation without prejudice to the rights, if any, of the corporation under any
 contract to which the officer is a party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 68.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9214.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 9141 and Section 9142, any note, mortgage, evidence of indebtedness, contract, conveyance or other instrument in writing, and any assignment or endorsement thereof, executed or entered into between any corporation and any other person, when signed by any one of the chairperson of the board, the president, or any vice president and by any one of the secretary, any assistant secretary, the chief financial officer, or any assistant treasurer of such corporation, is not invalidated as to the corporation by any lack of authority of the signing officers in the absence of actual knowledge on the part of the other person that the signing officers had no authority to execute the
 same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 69.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9215.

The original or a copy in writing or in any other form capable of being converted into clearly legible tangible form of the bylaws or of the minutes of any incorporators’, members’, directors’, committee or other meeting or of any resolution adopted by the board or a committee thereof, or members, certified to be a true copy by a person purporting to be the secretary or an assistant secretary of the corporation, is prima facie evidence of the adoption of such bylaws or resolution or of the due holding of such meeting and of the matters stated therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 254, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Selection, Removal and Resignation of Directors [9220. - 9226.]

9220.

(a) The articles or bylaws may provide for the tenure, election, selection, designation, removal, and resignation of directors.

(b) In the absence of any provision in the articles or bylaws, the term of directors shall be one year.

(c) Unless the articles or bylaws otherwise provide, each director, including a director elected to fill a vacancy, shall hold office until the expiration of the term for which elected and until a successor has been elected and qualified, unless the director has been removed from office.

(d) If a corporation has not issued memberships
 and (1) all the directors resign, die, or become incompetent, or (2) a corporation’s initial directors have not been named in the articles and all incorporators resign, die, or become incompetent before the election of the initial directors, the superior court of any county may appoint directors of the corporation upon application by any party in interest.

(e) If authorized in the articles or bylaws of a corporation, all or any portion of the directors may hold office ex officio by virtue of occupying a specified position within the corporation or outside the corporation. The term of office of an ex officio director shall coincide with that director’s respective
 term of office in the specified position entitling him or her to serve on the board of directors. Upon an ex officio director’s resignation or removal from that position, or resignation or removal from the board for any reason, the term of office as a director of the corporation shall immediately cease. At that time, the successor in office shall become an ex officio director of the corporation, occupying the place of the former director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 322, Sec. 4.   (AB 2557)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9221.

(a) The board may declare vacant the office of a director who has been declared of unsound mind by a final order of court, or convicted of a felony, or, if at the time a director is elected, the bylaws provide that a director may be removed for missing a specified number of board meetings, fails to attend the specified number of meetings.

(b) As provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 9151, the articles or bylaws may prescribe the qualifications of the directors. Unless otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws, the board, by a majority vote of the directors who meet all of the required qualifications to be a director, may declare vacant the office of any director who fails or ceases to meet any required qualification that was in effect at the beginning of that director’s current term of office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 589, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

9222.

(a) Except as provided in the articles or bylaws and subject to subdivision (b) of this section, any or all directors may be removed without cause if the removal is approved by the members (Section 5034).

(b) Except for a corporation having no members pursuant to Section 9310:

(1) When by the provisions of the articles or bylaws the members of any class, voting as a class, are entitled to elect one or more directors, any director so elected may be removed only by the applicable vote of the members of that class.

(2) When by the provisions of the articles or bylaws the members within a chapter or
 other organizational unit, or region or other geographic grouping, voting as such, are entitled to elect one or more directors, any director so elected may be removed only by the applicable vote of the members within the organizational unit or geographic grouping.

(c) Any reduction of the authorized number of directors or any amendment reducing the number of classes of directors does not remove any director prior to the expiration of the director’s term of office, unless the reduction or the amendment also provides for the removal of one or more specified directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 32.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9223.

(a) The superior court of the proper county may, at the suit of a director, or twice the authorized number (Section 5036) of members, remove from office any director in case of fraudulent acts and may bar from reelection any director so removed for a period prescribed by the court. The corporation shall be made a party to such action.

(b) The Attorney General may bring an action under subdivision (a), may intervene in such an action brought by any other party and shall be given notice of any such action brought by any other party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

9224.

(a) Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws and except for a vacancy created by the removal of a director by the members, vacancies on the board may be filled by approval of the board (Section 5032) or, if the number of directors then in office is less than a quorum, by (1) the unanimous written consent of the directors then in office, (2) the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors then in office at a meeting held pursuant to notice or waivers of notice complying with Section 9211, or (3) a sole remaining director.

(b) Subject to any provision in the articles or bylaws, the members may elect a director at any time to fill any
 vacancy not filled by the directors.

(c) Any director may resign effective upon giving written notice to the chairperson of the board, the president, the secretary or the board of directors of the corporation, unless the notice specifies a later time for the effectiveness of such resignation. If the resignation is effective at a future time, a successor may be elected to take office when the resignation becomes effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 70.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9226.

No director may resign where the corporation would then be left without a duly elected director or directors in charge of its affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Examination by Attorney General [9230. - 9230.]

9230.

(a) Except as the Attorney General is empowered to act in the enforcement of the criminal laws of this state, and except as the Attorney General is expressly empowered by subdivisions (b), (c) and (d), the Attorney General shall have no powers with respect to any corporation incorporated or classified as a religious corporation under or pursuant to this code.

(b) The Attorney General shall have authority to institute an action or proceeding under Section 803 of the Code of Civil Procedure, to obtain judicial determination that a corporation is not properly qualified or classified as a religious corporation under the provisions of this part.

(c) The Attorney General shall have the authority (1) expressly granted with respect to any subject or matter covered by Sections 9660 to 9690, inclusive; (2) to initiate criminal procedures to prosecute violations of the criminal laws, and upon conviction seek restitution as punishment; and (3) to represent as legal counsel any other agency or department of the State of California expressly empowered to act with respect to the status of religious corporations, or expressly empowered to regulate activities in which religious corporations, as well as other entities, may engage.

(d) Where property has been solicited and received from the general public, based on a representation that it would be used for a specific charitable purpose other than general support of the corporation’s activities, and has been used in a manner contrary to that specific charitable purpose for which the property was solicited, the Attorney General may institute an action to enforce the specific charitable purpose for which the property was solicited; provided (1) that before bringing such action the Attorney General shall notify the corporation that an action will be brought unless the corporation takes immediate steps to correct the improper diversion of funds, and (2) that in the event it becomes impractical or impossible for the corporation to devote the property to the specified charitable purpose, or that the directors or members of the corporation in good faith expressly conclude and record in writing that the stated purpose for which the property was contributed is no longer in accord with the policies of the corporation, then the directors or members of the corporation may approve or ratify in good faith the use of such property for the general purposes of the corporation rather than for the specific purpose for which it was contributed.

As used in this section, “solicited from the general public” means solicitations directed to the general public, or to any individual or group of individuals who are not directly affiliated with the soliciting organization and includes, but is not limited to, instances where property has been solicited on an individual basis, such as door to door, direct mail, face to face, or similar solicitations, as well as solicitations on a more general level to the general public, or a portion thereof, such as through the media, including newspapers, television, radio, or similar solicitations.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any individual rights of action which were accorded under law in existence prior to the enactment of Chapter 1324 of the Statutes of 1980.

As used in this section, “individual rights of action” include only rights enforceable by private individuals and do not include any right of action of a public officer in an official capacity regardless of whether the officer brings the action on behalf of a private individual.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require express statutory authorization by the California Legislature of any otherwise lawful and duly authorized action by any agency of local government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 797, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Standards of Conduct [9240. - 9247.]

9240.

(a) Any duties and liabilities set forth in this article shall apply without regard to whether a director is compensated by the corporation.

(b) Part 4 (commencing with Section 16000) of Division 9 of the Probate Code does not apply to the directors of any corporation.

(c) A director, in making a good faith determination, may consider what the director believes to be:

(1) The religious purposes of the corporation; and

(2) Applicable religious tenets, canons, laws, policies, and authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 923, Sec. 1.4.   Operative January 1, 1988, by Sec. 103 of Ch. 923.)
-------------------------------------------

9241.

(a) A director shall perform the duties of a director, including duties as a member of any committee of the board upon which the director may serve, in good faith, in a manner such director believes to be in the best interests of the corporation and with such care, including reasonable inquiry, as is appropriate under the circumstances.

(b) In performing the duties of a director, a director shall be entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, in each case prepared or presented by:

(1) One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director believes to be reliable and
 competent in the matters presented;

(2) Counsel, independent accountants, or other persons as to matters which the director believes to be within that person’s professional or expert competence;

(3) A committee upon which the director does not serve that is composed exclusively of any or any combination of directors, persons described in paragraph (1), or persons described in paragraph (2), as to matters within the committee’s designated authority, which committee the director believes to merit confidence; or

(4) Religious authorities and ministers, priests, rabbis, or other persons whose position or duties in the religious organization the director believes justify reliance and confidence and whom the director believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented, so long as, in any case, the director acts
 in good faith, after reasonable inquiry when the need therefor is indicated by the circumstances, and without knowledge that would cause that reliance to be unwarranted.

(c) The provisions of this section, and not Section 9243, shall govern any action or omission of a director in regard to the compensation of directors, as directors or officers, or any loan of money or property to or guaranty of the obligation of any director or officer. No obligation, otherwise valid, shall be voidable merely because directors who benefited by a board resolution to pay such compensation or to make such loan or guaranty participated in making such board resolution.

(d) Except as provided in Section 9243, a person who performs the duties of a director in accordance with subdivisions (a) and (b) shall have no liability based upon any alleged failure to discharge his or her obligations as a director,
 including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, any actions or omissions which exceed or defeat any purpose to which the corporation, or assets held by it, may be dedicated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 631, Sec. 33.   (AB 1233)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9242.

(a) Section 9241 governs the duties of directors as to any acts or omissions in connection with the election, selection, or nomination of directors.

(b) This section shall not be construed to limit the provisions of Section 9241.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

9243.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), for the purpose of this section, a self-dealing transaction means a transaction to which the corporation is a party and in which one or more of its directors has a material financial interest and which does not meet the requirements of paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (d). Such a director is an “interested director” for the purpose of this section.

(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) An action of the board fixing the compensation of a director as a director or officer of the corporation or making any loan of money or property to, or guaranteeing the obligation of, any director or officer.

(2) A transaction which is part of a public, charitable or religious program of the corporation if it (A) is approved or authorized by the corporation in good faith and without unjustified favoritism, and (B) results in a benefit to one or more directors or their families because they are in the class of persons intended to be benefited by the public, charitable or religious program.

(3) A transaction, of which the interested director or directors have no actual knowledge, and which does not exceed the lesser of 1 percent of the gross receipts of the corporation for the preceding fiscal year or one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(c) Any of the following may bring an action in the superior court of the proper county for the remedies specified in subdivision (h):

(1) The corporation, or a member asserting the right in the name of the corporation; however, for the purpose of this paragraph the provisions of Section 5710 shall apply to the action.

(2) A director of the corporation.

(3) An officer of the corporation.

(4) Any person authorized by the bylaws to bring an action.

(d) In any action brought under subdivision (c) the remedies specified in subdivision (h) shall not be granted if:

(1) The Attorney General, or the court in an action in which the Attorney General is an indispensable party, has approved the transaction before or after it was consummated; or

(2) The transaction is approved or ratified in good faith by the members (Section 5034) other than the directors, after notice and disclosure to the members of the material facts concerning the transaction and the director’s interest in the transaction; or

(3) The following facts are established:

(A) The corporation entered into the transaction for its own benefit or for the benefit of the religious organization;

(B) The transaction was fair and reasonable as to the corporation or was in furtherance of its religious purposes at the time the corporation entered into the transaction;

(C) Prior to consummating the transaction or any part thereof, the board authorized or approved the transaction in good faith by a vote of a majority of the directors then in office without counting the vote of the interested director or directors, and with knowledge of the material facts concerning the transaction and the director’s interest in the transaction. Except as provided in paragraph (4), action by a committee of the board shall not satisfy this paragraph; and

(D) (i) Prior to authorizing or approving the transaction, the board considered and in good faith determined after reasonable investigation under the circumstances that either the corporation could not have obtained a more advantageous arrangement with reasonable effort under the circumstances or the transaction was in furtherance of the corporation’s religious purposes or (ii) in fact, either the corporation could not have obtained a more advantageous arrangement with reasonable effort under the circumstances or the transaction was in furtherance of the corporation’s religious purposes; or

(4) The following facts are established:

(A) A committee or person authorized by the board approved the transaction in a manner consistent with the standards set forth in paragraph (3).

(B) It was not reasonably practicable to obtain approval of the board prior to entering into the transaction; and

(C) The board, after determining in good faith that the conditions of subparagraphs (A) and (B) were satisfied, ratified the transaction at its next meeting by a vote of the majority of the directors then in office without counting the vote of the interested director or directors.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (f), an action under subdivision (c) or Section 9230 shall be commenced within two years after written notice setting forth the material facts of the transaction is filed with the Attorney General in accordance with such regulations, if any, as the Attorney General may adopt or if no such notice is filed, five years after the cause of action has accrued.

(f) In any action for breach of an obligation of the corporation owed to an interested director, where the obligation arises from a self-dealing transaction which has not been approved as provided in subdivision (d), the court may, by way of offset only, make any order authorized by subdivision (h), notwithstanding the expiration of the applicable period specified in subdivision (e).

(g) Interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the board which authorizes, approves or ratifies a contract or transaction.

(h) If a self-dealing transaction has taken place, the interested director or directors shall do such things and pay such damages as in the discretion of the court will provide an equitable and fair remedy to the corporation, taking into account any benefit received by the corporation and whether the interested director or directors acted in good faith and with intent to further the best interest of the corporation. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the court may order the director to do any or all of the following:

(1) Account for any profits made from the transaction, and pay them to the corporation.

(2) Pay the corporation the value of the use of any of its property used in the transactions.

(3) Return or replace any property lost to the corporation as a result of the transaction, together with any income or appreciation lost to the corporation by reason of the transaction, or account for any proceeds of sale of the property, and pay the proceeds to the corporation together with interest at the legal rate.

The court may award prejudgment interest to the extent allowed in Sections 3287 and 3288 of the Civil Code. In addition, the court may, in its discretion, grant exemplary damages for a fraudulent or malicious violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 812, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

9244.

(a) No contract or other transaction between a corporation and any domestic or foreign corporation, firm or association of which one or more of its directors are directors is either void or voidable because such director or directors are present at the meeting of the board or a committee thereof which authorizes, approves or ratifies the contract or transaction, if:

(1) The material facts as to the transaction and as to such director’s other directorship are fully disclosed or known to the board or committee, and the board or committee authorizes, approves or ratifies the contract or transaction in good faith by a vote sufficient without counting the vote of the common director or directors; or

(2) As to contracts or transactions not approved as provided in paragraph (1) of this subdivision, the contract or transaction is just and reasonable as to the corporation, taking into account its religious purposes, or is in furtherance of its religious purposes at the time it is authorized, approved or ratified.

(b) This section does not apply to transactions covered by Section 9243.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

9245.

(a) Subject to the provisions of Section 9241, directors of a corporation who approve any of the following corporate actions shall be jointly and severally liable to the corporation for:

(1) The making of any distribution.

(2) The distribution of assets after institution of dissolution proceedings of the corporation, without paying or adequately providing for all known liabilities of the corporation, excluding any claims not filed by creditors within the time limit set by the court in a notice given to creditors under Section 9680 and those sections made applicable to this part by Section 9680.

(3) The making of any loan or guaranty contrary to Section 9241.

(b) Suit may be brought in the name of the corporation to enforce the liability:

(1) Under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) against any or all directors liable by the persons entitled to sue under subdivision (b) of Section 9610;

(2) Under paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) against any or all directors liable by any one or more creditors of the corporation whose debts or claims arose prior to the time of the corporate action who have not consented to the corporate action, whether or not they have reduced their claims to judgment.

(c) The damages recoverable from a director under this section shall be the amount of the illegal distribution, or if the illegal distribution consists of property, the fair market value of that property at the time of the illegal distribution, plus interest thereon from the date of the distribution at the legal rate on judgments until paid, together with all reasonably incurred costs of appraisal or other valuation, if any, of that property, or the loss suffered by the corporation as a result of the illegal loan or guaranty.

(d) Any director sued under this section may implead all other directors liable and may compel contribution, either in that action or in an independent action against directors not joined in that action.

(e) Directors liable under this section shall also be entitled to be subrogated to the rights of the corporation as follows:

(1) With respect to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), against members who received the distribution.

(2) With respect to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), against the members who received the distribution.

(3) With respect to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), against the person who received the loan or guaranty.

Any director sued under this section may file a cross-complaint against the person or persons who are liable to the director as a result of the subrogation provided for in this subdivision or may proceed against them in an independent action.
